Florida, session 2026, SB226.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 9 10 Section 1.âSubsection (18) of section 681.102, Florida 11 Statutes, is amended to read: 12 681.102âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 13 (18)ââPurchase priceâ means the cash price as defined in s. 14 520.31(2), inclusive of any allowance for a trade-in vehicle, 15 but excludes debt from any other transaction. âAny allowance for 16 a trade-in vehicleâ means the net trade-in allowance as 17 reflected in the purchase contract or lease agreement if 18 acceptable to the consumer and manufacturer. If such amount is 19 not acceptable to the consumer and manufacturer, then the trade 20 in allowance must shall be an amount equal to 100 percent of the 21 retail price of the trade-in vehicle as reflected in J.D. Power, 22 or the nearest valuation date listed for the trade-in vehicle by 23 J.D. Power the NADA Official Used Car Guide (Southeastern 24 Edition) or NADA Recreation Vehicle Appraisal Guide, whichever 25 is applicable, in effect at the time of the trade-in. The 26 manufacturer is shall be responsible for providing the 27 applicable J.D. Power valuation NADA book. 28 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.